ru: Размер сцепного устройства прицепа: 1 7/8 дюйма; 2 дюйма; 2 5/16 дюйма; 3 дюйма; Другое
fi: Perävaunun liittimen koko: 1 7/8 in; 2 in; 2 5/16 in; 3 in; Muu
ko: 트레일러 커플러 사이즈: 1-7/8인치; 2인치; 2-5/16인치; 3인치; 기타
el: Μέγεθος συνδέσμου τρέιλερ: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Άλλο
pt-BR: Reboque tamanho do acoplador: 1-7/8 pol.; 2 pol.; 2-5/16 pol.; 3 pol.; Outro
en: Trailer coupler size: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Other
tr: Treyler kaplin ölçüsü: 1-7/8 inç; 2 inç; 2-5/16 inç; 3 inç; Diğer
pl: Rozmiar zaczepu przyczepy: 1 7/8 cala; 2 cale; 2 5/16 cala; 3 cale; Inne
ro-RO: Dimensiunea cuplajului remorcii: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Altele
cs: Velikost tažného zařízení pro přívěs: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Jiná
da: Koblingsstørrelse for trailer: 1-7/8 tommer; 2 tommer; 2-5/16 tommer; 3 tommer; Andet
lt-LT: Priekabos sukabintuvo dydis: 1-7/8 col.; 2 col.; 2-5/16 col.; 3 col.; Kita
hu: Utánfutó vonószerkezetének mérete: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Egyéb
es: Tamaño de acoplador del remolque: 1-7/8 pulg.; 2 pulg.; 2-5/16 pulg.; 3 pulg.; Otro
hr-HR: Veličina spojnice za prikolicu: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Ostalo
fr: Taille de la tête d’attelage de la remorque: 1-7/8 po; 2 po; 2-5/16 po; 3 po; Autre
de: Größe der Anhängerkupplung: 1-7/8 Zoll; 2 Zoll; 2-5/16 Zoll; 3 Zoll; Sonstige
zh-TW: 拖車聯結器尺寸: 1-7/8 吋; 2 吋; 2-5/16 吋; 3 吋; 其他
sl-SI: Velikost sklopke priklopnika: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Drugo
pt-PT: Tamanho do engate do reboque: 1-7/8 pol.; 2 pol.; 2-5/16 pol.; 3 pol.; Outro
it: Misura dell'attacco del rimorchio: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Altro
bg-BG: Размер на тегличната топка за ремарке: 1-7/8 инча; 2 инча; 2-5/16 инча; 3 инча; Друго
th: ขนาดข้อต่อรถพ่วง: 1-7/8 นิ้ว; 2 นิ้ว; 2-5/16 นิ้ว; 3 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
ja: トレーラーカプラーサイズ: 1-7/8 インチ; 2 インチ; 2-5/16 インチ; 3 インチ; その他
sk-SK: Veľkosť spojky návesu: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Iné
nb: Størrelse på tilhengerkobling: 1-7/8 tommer; 2 tommer; 2-5/16 tommer; 3 tommer; Annet
vi: Kích thước của khớp nối rơ-moóc: 1-7/8 in; 2 in; 2-5/16 in; 3 in; Khác
nl: Trailerkoppeling maat: 1 7/8 inch; 2 inch; 2 5/16 inch; 3 inch; Overig
sv: Släpvagnskoppling – storlek: 1 7/8 tum; 2 tum; 2 5/16 tum; 3 tum; Övrigt
zh-CN: 拖车连接器尺寸: 1-7/8 英寸; 2 英寸; 2-5/16 英寸; 3 英寸; 其他